Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 3

History Commissions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapter 1 may not apply to subchapter 2 which was enacted subsequently.

Cross References.

Cooperation with Bureau of War Records, §12-61-123.

County museum commissions, agreements with, §13-5-503.

Revoked charters of inactive towns or cities, §14-39-102.

State library, duties, §13-2-207.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 7: May 30, 1911. Emergency declared.

Acts 1963, No. 207, § 9: Mar. 8, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found that, under existing law, appointments of the members of the commission are not subject to the approval of the Senate as in the instance of a large majority of the other important boards and commissions of the state; that such appointments should be subject to the approval of the Senate; and that Section 2 of this act provides that the Governor's appointments shall be by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, thereby making it necessary for this act to take effect immediately in order that the Governor may appoint, and the Senate confirm the appointment of, the members of the commission before adjournment of the General Assembly. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force on and after its passage and approval.”

Subchapter 1

— Arkansas State Archives

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Due to the addition of Subchapter 2 of this chapter by Acts 1991, No. 1233, the preexisting provisions of this chapter have been designated as Subchapter 1.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 93, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas History Commission to the Department of Arkansas Heritage.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas History Commission within the Department of Parks and Tourism is transferred to the Department of Arkansas Heritage by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Arkansas Heritage shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Arkansas Heritage except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage.

“(d)

After the transfer under subsections (a)-(c) of this section, the Arkansas History Commission formerly within the Department of Parks and Tourism shall be renamed the Arkansas State Archives.

“(e)

The members of the Arkansas History Commission appointed under §13-3-102 and their successors shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the Arkansas History Commission except as specified in this act.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, §
99 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in the subchapter heading.

Preambles.

Acts 2005, No. 673 contained a preamble which read:

“WHEREAS, B.B. King and ‘Lucille’, his guitar and constant companion since 1949, have become legends in the world of blues; and

“WHEREAS, the story of B.B. King naming his guitar ‘Lucille’ is legendary in its own right and inextricably linked to the history of a small town in Arkansas; and

“WHEREAS, in 1949 when B.B. King's career was in its infancy, one of his stops on the road was at a dance hall in Twist, Arkansas, on a cold winter night. In order to keep the dance hall warm, a large barrel of kerosene was placed in the center of the room and was filled about half-way with fuel. The kerosene was then lighted to heat the room, a practice which was not uncommon in those days; and

“WHEREAS, as B.B. King entertained the crowd, two (2) men started a brawl over a woman named ‘Lucille’ and knocked over the barrel of burning kerosene. Like a river of fire, the burning fuel spilled over the floor. Everyone, including B.B. King, ran for the front door. Once outside, B.B. King realized that he had left his guitar, a Gibson acoustic, at the mercy of the inferno. Back inside the collapsing building he went to rescue his guitar, almost losing his life in the process. The blaze that night claimed two (2) lives; and

“WHEREAS, B.B. King named his guitar ‘Lucille’, and also every guitar he has owned since that night, to remind him never again to risk his life for a material possession; and

“WHEREAS, upon speaking about ‘Lucille’, B.B. King says, ‘I'm very crazy about Lucille. I've had many guitars … and I always call them Lucille. She's taken me a long way, even brought me some fame … most of all, she's kept me alive, being able to eat … Lucille practically saved my life two or three times …’,

“NOW THEREFORE,”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 6: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-3-101. Creation — Purpose.

(a)

The Arkansas State Archives is created and established at the seat of government of this state for the purposes of:

(1)

Keeping and caring for the official archives of this state;

(2)

Collecting materials bearing on the history of Arkansas from the earliest times;

(3)

Copying and editing official records and other historical materials;

(4)

Encouraging historical work and research; and

(5)

Performing work in relation to the foregoing.

(b)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and the Building Authority Division shall determine the facility needs of the Arkansas State Archives.

(c)

The Building Authority Division may locate and negotiate an appropriate facility for the Arkansas State Archives, but the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall have final approval of the facility's location.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 5514, 5515; Pope's Dig., §§ 12236, 12237; Acts 1963, No. 207, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 933, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-201, 6-202; Acts 2003, No. 611, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 6; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 6; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 100; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 100; 2019, No. 910, § 5551.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas History Commission and its functions, powers, and duties were transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 1 transfer pursuant to Acts 1971, No. 38, § 7.

Acts 1947, No. 170, § 5, provided that §25-18-301, designating the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville as an official state depository for public documents, was cumulative to and did not repeal this subchapter.

Section13-2-202 provides that nothing in §13-2-201 et seq. affects the powers and duties of the Arkansas History Commission.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added the subdivision designations and made stylistic changes in (a); rewrote (b); and added (c).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (b).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in the introductory language of (a); in (b), substituted “Department of Arkansas Heritage” for the first occurrence of “commission” and “Arkansas State Archives” for the last occurrence of “commission”; and rewrote (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (b) and (c); substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (b); and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (c).

13-3-102. Members.

(a)

The Arkansas History Commission shall consist of seven (7) members, residents and electors of this state, to be appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. Each congressional district shall be represented by membership on the commission.

(b)

The term of office of each member of the commission shall commence on January 15 following the expiration date of his or her predecessor's term and shall end on January 14 of the seventh year following the year in which the term commenced.

(c)

Any vacancies arising in the membership of the commission for any reason other than expiration of the regular terms for which the members were appointed shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, and to be thereafter effective until the expiration of the regular terms, subject, however, to the confirmation of the Senate when it is next in session.

(d)

Before entering upon his or her duties, each member of the commission shall take and subscribe, and file in the office of the Secretary of State, an oath to support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution and to faithfully perform the duties of the office upon which he or she is about to enter.

(e)

From time to time, the commission shall select from its membership a chair and a vice chair.

(f)

Members of the commission shall receive no pay for their services but may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

(g)

The commission shall advise and assist the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism in the performance of his or her duties under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 5515; Pope's Dig., § 12237; Acts 1963, No. 207, § 2; 1981, No. 639, § 1; 1985, No. 933, § 1; 1985, No. 934, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-202; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 74; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 101; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 101; 2019, No. 910, § 5552.

Publisher's Notes.

The terms of the members of the Arkansas History Commission are arranged so that one term expires on January 14 of every year.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 added (g).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (g).

13-3-103. Meetings — Records.

(a)(1)

The Arkansas History Commission shall meet:

(A)

Upon the request of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism; and

(B)

At a time and place that is convenient to the commission.

(2)

Meetings of the commission shall be open to the public.

(b)

The commission shall adopt and may modify rules for the conduct of its business. The commission shall keep a record of its transactions, findings, and determinations, which record shall be public.

(c)

The State Historian provided for in this chapter shall be ex officio secretary of the commission but shall have no vote on matters coming before it.

(d)

A quorum shall consist of not less than four (4) members present at any regular or special meeting. The affirmative vote of that number shall be necessary for the disposition of any business.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 5515; Pope's Dig., § 12237; Acts 1963, No. 207, § 2; 1981, No. 639, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-202; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 102; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 102; 2019, No. 910, § 5553.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 rewrote (a); deleted former (c) and redesignated former (d) and (e) as present (c) and (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(1)(A).

13-3-104. Powers and duties.

(a)

All records, papers, archives, and historical material at any time in the possession of the Arkansas State Archives, excepting such as it may have on loan, shall be and remain the property of the State of Arkansas. It shall also be the function, power, and duty of the Arkansas State Archives to:

(1)

Receive, classify, and preserve, through the making of photographic copies or by other means, all official archives of Arkansas, its counties, its municipalities, and its other subdivisions, which may come either permanently or temporarily into the Arkansas State Archives's custody;

(2)

Collect, classify, and preserve, through the making of photographic copies or by other means, all records, manuscripts, maps, diaries, letters, war service records, journals, and papers of historical value, pertaining to Arkansas and Arkansans;

(3)

Collect and preserve, through the making of photographic copies or by other means, all files of such Arkansas newspapers as it may acquire either permanently or temporarily;

(4)

Collect and preserve portraits, photographs, sketches, drawings, and other likenesses of eminent Arkansans, historic places, houses, buildings, and scenes in Arkansas;

(5)

Select and publish any state papers and other source material of Arkansas history it shall deem appropriate and its funds will permit;

(6)

Build up and maintain at its headquarters a reference library of the source material of Arkansas history;

(7)

Establish and maintain at its headquarters any permanent or temporary displays of historic relics and other articles and objects of historic interest, which it shall determine to be desirable or feasible; and

(8)

Ascertain the location of battlefields within the state on which battles were fought in the War Between the States, prepare data as to the troops employed in such engagements, ascertain which battlefields should be marked by suitable markers, accept designs for the markers, and, within the limit of funds available for the purpose, acquire and place markers in suitable positions on those battlefields, subject, in each instance, to the approval of the owners of the land.

(b)

The Arkansas State Archives may:

(1)

Adopt and use a seal;

(2)

Destroy, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any materials in its possession, except borrowed materials, that it may find to be surplus to its needs;

(3)(A)

Establish and make reasonable charges for furnishing research services, archival services, or copies of materials in its possession.

(B)

The funds collected shall be deposited to the credit of the Arkansas State Archive's account in a bank and from time to time withdrawn for the maintenance and operation of the Arkansas State Archives;

(4)(A)

Receive and expend any moneys arising from grants, contributions, or gratuities, receive bequests or donations of real or personal property, convert into money any property that cannot be used in the form received, and expend the money for any of the functions performable by it.

(B)

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prescribe rules for the handling of these moneys;

(5)

Cooperate with, and receive the cooperation of, historical associations and other nonprofit organizations devoted to the history of this state;

(6)

Contract and be contracted with; and

(7)

Take other action not inconsistent with law that it considers necessary in the performance of any of its functions.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, §§ 3, 4; 1963, No. 207, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-203, 6-204; Acts 2015, No. 25, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 103; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 103.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the introductory language in (b); deleted “worthless or” preceding “surplus” in (b)(2); substituted “research services, archival services, or copies” for “photographic and certified copies” in (b)(3)(A); substituted “for the maintenance and operation of the commission” for “therefrom for the purchase of photographic equipment and supplies, to pay for processing films, and for related purposes” in (b)(3)(B); added the (A) and (B) designations in (b)(4); and rewrote (b)(7).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Arkansas State Archives” for “commission” and variations throughout the section; and substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in the introductory language of (a).

13-3-105. Delegation to State Historian.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage may delegate his or her powers and duties concerning the Arkansas State Archives to the State Historian.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 5515; Pope's Dig., § 12237; Acts 1963, No. 207, § 2; 1981, No. 639, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-202; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 104; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 104; 2019, No. 910, § 5554.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage”.

13-3-106. State Historian — Powers and duties.

(a)

The State Historian shall:

(1)

Serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism; and

(2)

Devote his or her entire time of employment to the duties of his or her employment.

(b)

The State Historian shall have:

(1)

A doctoral degree in the field of history from an accredited institution of higher education; or

(2)

Been determined by the Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage to be qualified to perform the duties of State Historian after considering:

(A)

The person's academic background;

(B)

The person's editorial ability;

(C)

The person's knowledge of and interest in history;

(D)

The person's experience in the field of history; and

(E)

Any other factor the director determines to be relevant to performing the functions of the position.

(c)(1)(A)

The State Historian shall furnish bond to the state, with a corporate surety thereon, in the penal sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(B)

This bond shall be conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform his or her duties of employment and properly account for all funds received and disbursed by him or her.

(2)

The State Historian shall not be required to furnish additional bond as disbursing agent, nor shall he or she be required to furnish additional bond as disbursing agent of other appropriations for which he or she may be designated disbursing agent under or pursuant to any law of this state unless so directed by the General Assembly.

(3)

The bond so furnished shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(4)

An executed counterpart of the bond shall be filed with the Auditor of State.

(d)

The State Historian shall administer the provisions of this chapter and the rules and orders established under this chapter as instructed by the secretary.

(e)

[Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 5515; Pope's Dig., § 12237; Acts 1963, No. 207, § 2; 1981, No. 639, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-202; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 105; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 105; 2019, No. 315, § 979; 2019, No. 910, §§
5555-5557.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (e) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 rewrote (a) and (b); deleted former (c) and (d); redesignated former (e)-(g) as (c)-(e); added “as instructed by the director” in present (d); substituted “director” for “commission” in present (e); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(1); substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in the introductory language of (b)(2); and repealed (e).

13-3-107. Preservation of public officials' records.

(a)(1)

At his or her discretion, any state, county, or other official is authorized and empowered to turn over to the Arkansas State Archives, for permanent preservation, any official books, records, documents, original papers, and newspaper files not in current use in his or her office.

(2)

When so surrendered, copies from the state, county, or other official's office shall be made and certified by the Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage upon the application of any person interested, which certification shall have the force and effect as if made by the officer originally in the custody of them, and for which the same fee shall be charged to be collected in advance.

(b)(1)

All officers of this state and of its political subdivisions, as requested by the Arkansas State Archives, shall make available for copying or photographing such of their records and other materials as the Arkansas State Archives deems advisable for historical purposes.

(2)

Before destroying or discarding outdated records, other than ephemeral materials, each officer shall advise the Arkansas State Archives in writing of his or her intentions, and records that have a historical value, as determined by the director, shall be given to the Arkansas State Archives.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 5519; Pope's Dig., § 12241; Acts 1963, No. 207, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-207; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 106; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 106; 2019, No. 910, § 5558.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (a)(1); substituted “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” for “secretary of the commission” in (a)(2); substituted “Arkansas State Archives” for “commission” in (b)(1) twice and in (b)(2) twice; substituted “director” for “commission” in (b)(2); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(2).

13-3-108. Preservation of state publications.

Two (2) copies of every publication of the State of Arkansas shall be placed at the disposal of the Arkansas State Archives, and shall be preserved, by photographic or other means, in the archives of the Arkansas State Archives.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 355, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 5520; Pope's Dig., § 12242; Acts 1963, No. 207, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-208; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 107; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 107.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” and “Arkansas State Archives” for “commission”.

13-3-109. Permanent marker to commemorate B.B. King.

The Arkansas State Archives shall erect a permanent marker in the town of Twist, Arkansas, to commemorate the legendary B.B. King and the event that led to his naming his famous guitar “Lucille” while he was performing there.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 673, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 108; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 108.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission”.

Subchapter 2

— Black History Commission of Arkansas

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapter 1 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-3-201. Purpose.

The Black History Commission of Arkansas is created and established at the seat of government of this state for the purpose of:

(1)

Advising the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism with respect to gathering, developing, and keeping the history of a segment of Arkansas society whose history has been overlooked and forgotten and has been simply neglected because of a lack of concern;

(2)

Collecting materials bearing on the history of black Arkansans from the earliest times;

(3)

Encouraging historical work and research in the background of black Arkansans to help the young citizens of the state appreciate their heritage; and

(4)

Performing work in relation to the history of black Arkansans.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, § 1; 2001, No. 1553, § 22; 2007, No. 1601, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 109; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 109; 2019, No. 910, § 5559.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” for “Arkansas History Commission” in (1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (1).

13-3-202. Members.

(a)

The Black History Commission of Arkansas shall consist of seven (7) members who shall be residents and electors of this state. The members shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate.

(b)

The term of office of each member of the commission shall commence on January 15 following the expiration date of his or her predecessor's term and shall end on January 14 of the seventh year following the year in which the term commenced.

(c)

The membership of the commission shall be made up of persons who are citizens of the state at large and who have demonstrated an interest in the collection, recordation, preservation, and development of the history of black Arkansans.

(d)

Any vacancies arising in the membership of the commission for any reason other than expiration of the regular terms for which the members were appointed shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, and to be thereafter effective until the expiration of the regular terms, subject, however, to the confirmation of the Senate when it is next in session.

(e)

The commission shall select from its membership a chair and a vice chair.

(f)

Members of the commission may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, § 2; 1995, No. 980, § 1; 1995, No. 1296, § 43; 1997, No. 250, § 75; 2007, No. 1601, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, § 2, provided, in part, that except for the initial members of the committee, each member shall serve a seven (7) year term. Of the initial members, their terms will be staggered between one (1) year and seven (7) years, determined by lot at the committee’s first meeting.

13-3-203. Meetings — Rules and bylaws — Secretary.

(a)

The Black History Commission of Arkansas shall meet at such times and places as in each instance may suit the commission's convenience and its purposes, and all meetings shall be open to the public.

(b)(1)

The commission shall adopt and may modify rules and bylaws for the conduct of its business, subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

(2)

The commission shall keep a record of its transactions, findings, and determinations, which record shall be public.

(c)

The rules shall provide for regular meetings and for special meetings at the call of the Chair of the Black History Commission of Arkansas or in his or her absence or incapacity, the vice chair, or upon written request of at least four (4) members.

(d)

The State Historian shall be ex officio secretary of the commission but shall have no vote on matters coming before it.

(e)

A quorum of the commission shall consist of not less than four (4) members present at any regular or special meeting. The affirmative vote of that number shall be necessary for the disposition of any business.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, § 3; 2007, No. 1601, § 3; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 110; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 110; 2019, No. 910, § 5560.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” for “Arkansas History Commission” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (b)(1).

13-3-204. Duties — Records, papers, archives, and historical materials property of state.

(a)

It shall be the function, power, and duty of the Black History Commission of Arkansas to assist the Arkansas History Commission and the Arkansas State Archives to:

(1)

Collect, classify, and preserve, through the making of photographic copies or by other means, records, manuscripts, maps, diaries, letters, war service records, journals, and papers of historical value, pertaining to the black race in Arkansas and black Arkansans;

(2)

Collect and preserve portraits, photographs, sketches, drawings, and other likenesses of eminent black Arkansans and historic places, houses, buildings, and scenes involving the black race in Arkansas;

(3)

Select and publish any papers, research, and other source material on the contribution of the black race in Arkansas history which it shall deem appropriate and funds will permit;

(4)

Build up and maintain a reference library of the source material on the black race in Arkansas history; and

(5)

Cooperate with, and receive the cooperation of, any historical associations or any black historical associations and other nonprofit organizations devoted to the history or the black history of this state.

(b)

All records, papers, archives, and historical material at any time in the possession of the Black History Commission of Arkansas, excepting such as it may have on loan, shall be and remain the property of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, § 4; 2007, No. 1601, § 4; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 111; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 111.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 inserted “and the Arkansas State Archives” in the introductory language of (a).

13-3-205. State Historian's duties — Location of Black History Commission of Arkansas.

(a)(1)

The State Historian shall assist the Black History Commission of Arkansas in the performance of its duties and shall be the custodian of all property and reference and source materials of the commission.

(2)

The State Historian shall be charged with the duty of administering this subchapter.

(b)

The offices of the commission and the archives of its records shall be located with the records of the Arkansas State Archives.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, §§ 1, 6; 2003, No. 611, § 2; 2007, No. 1601, § 5; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 112; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 112.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment deleted “in the One Capitol Mall Building, State Capitol, Little Rock” at the end of (b).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (b), substituted “the records” for “those” and “State Archives” for “History Commission”.

13-3-206. Historical contributions by the black race — Arkansas history courses.

(a)

The Black History Commission of Arkansas and the Commissioner of Education or his or her designee shall cooperate with each other to develop the materials for a program of historical contributions by the black race in Arkansas for inclusion in the curriculum segment of the Arkansas history required to be instructed in §6-16-124.

(b)

The Commissioner of Education shall ensure that these materials are reproduced and sent to all school districts in the state as a resource for inclusion in the Arkansas history courses.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1233, § 5; 2007, No. 1601, § 6.